North Carolina, session 2025, HB772.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding the following new subdivision to
read:
"(70) To Provide Students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Phone Number and the
NC Peer Warmline Phone Number. – A local board of education shall adopt
a policy to ensure all schools in the local school administrative unit provide
students the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC
Peer Warmline. The board shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline
and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number
has changed, schools shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the schools shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(37) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – The board of trustees shall provide students
the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer
Warmline. The board shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and
the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the board shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the board shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
*H772-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) To Provide Students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Phone Number and the NC Peer
Warmline Phone Number. – A charter school shall provide students the phone numbers for the
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone
numbers for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone
number has changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone
number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, call
988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the
following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this
subsection requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – A regional school shall provide students the
phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline.
The school shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the
Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5. G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – A laboratory school shall provide students
the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer
Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and
Page 2 House Bill 772-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 6. Part 1 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-550.2. Provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number.
Each private church school or school of religious charter shall provide students the phone
numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify
that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If
either phone number has changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an
updated phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call
855-733-7762" in the following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this section
requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 7. Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-558.2. Provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number.
Each qualified nonpublic school shall provide students the phone numbers for the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone numbers
for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone number exists,
the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME
to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this section
requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
House Bill 772-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 8. G.S. 115D-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(aa) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy requiring all community
colleges to provide students the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC
Peer Warmline. The State Board shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the
Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has changed, the community
colleges shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone number exists, the
community colleges shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or
text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the
following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued. The text shall be in a
conspicuous location on the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or
affixed by sticker. Nothing in this subsection requires a school to issue a
student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 9. G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(3d) The Board of Governors shall adopt a policy requiring all constituent
institutions to provide students the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The Board of Governors shall verify that
the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate
annually. If either phone number has changed, the constituent institutions shall
use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone number exists, the
constituent institutions shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer
Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued. The text shall
be in a conspicuous location on the student ID. The text may be printed
on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this subdivision requires a
school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 10. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 4 House Bill 772-Second Edition